Montana, session 2025, HB778.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 20-5-109, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-5-109. Nonpublic and home school requirements for compulsory enrollment exemption. (1)
To qualify its students for exemption from compulsory enrollment under 20-5-102, a nonpublic or home school:
(1) (a) shall maintain records on pupil attendance and disease immunization and make the records
available to the county superintendent of schools on request;
(2) (b) shall provide at least the minimum aggregate hours of pupil instruction in accordance with 20-1-
301 and 20-1-302;
(3) (c) must be housed in a building that complies with applicable local health and safety regulations;
and
(4) (d) shall provide an organized course of study that includes instruction in the subjects required of
public schools as a basic instructional program pursuant to 20-7-111; and.
(5) (2) in the case of home schools, To qualify its students for exemption from compulsory enrollment
under 20-5-102, a home school:
(a) shall notify the county superintendent of schools of the county in which the home school is
located in each school fiscal year of the student's attendance at the school;
(b) shall maintain records on pupil attendance and make the records available to the county
superintendent on request;
(c) shall provide at least the minimum aggregate hours of pupil instruction in accordance with 20-1-
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 778
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 778
301 and 20-1-302; and
(d) shall provide an organized course of study that includes instruction in the subjects required of
public schools as a basic instructional program pursuant to 20-7-111."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 778
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 778, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 778
INTRODUCED BY R. GREGG, B. LER, L. DEMING, B. MITCHELL
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING REQUIREMENTS REGARDING HOME SCHOOLS; SEPARATING THE
REQUIREMENTS FOR HOME SCHOOLS FROM THE REQUIREMENTS FOR NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS;
AMENDING SECTION 20-5-109, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”